Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
APPREHENSION AND RESTRAINT

[§124A-11] Apprehension. (a)
Apprehension is the taking of a person into custody.

(b) Any person authorized by this chapter, or
by rules issued under it, to apprehend persons subject to this chapter, any
marshal of a court-martial appointed pursuant to this chapter, and any peace
officer authorized to do so by law, may do so upon reasonable belief that an
offense has been committed and that the person apprehended committed it.

(c) Commissioned officers, warrant officers,
petty officers, and noncommissioned officers may quell quarrels, affrays, and
disorders among persons subject to this chapter and apprehend persons subject
to this chapter who take part therein. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next